Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 4. Private School Licensing

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 34, § 3 provides:

“(a) Any private degree granting post secondary education institution licensed to operate or do business in Wyoming under W.S.

21-2-401

through

21-2-407

prior to July 1, 2006, shall on and after July 1, 2006, be registered with the Wyoming department of education pursuant to W.S.

21-2-401

(b), as amended under section 1 of this act, in order to continue to operate or do business in Wyoming.

“(b) The department of education shall by rule and regulation establish criteria to provide for the transition of private degree granting post secondary education institutions licensed prior to July 1, 2006, to registration requirements imposed under this act. Criteria shall include monitoring steps defining progress towards accreditation by a recognized accrediting association as required under W.S. 21-2-402(b), as amended under section 1 of this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 34, § 4 provides: “All rules and regulations promulgated by the state board of education pertaining to private school licensing under W.S.

21-2-401

through

21-2-407

in effect prior to the effective date of this section shall remain in effect and unaltered as rules and regulations of the department of education until amended or repealed by the department.”

§ 21-2-401.
License required; registration required for private degree granting post secondary education institutions; department of education to administer and set minimum standards for licensure.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, all trade, correspondence, distance education, technical, vocational, business or other private schools which are located within the state or have their principal place of business out of state but are doing business in the state, shall be licensed under this article before operating or doing business in this state.

Any private degree granting post secondary education institution shall prior to operating or doing business in this state or continuing to operate or do business in this state, notify the department of education pursuant to W.S. 21-2-402(f) or be registered with the department in accordance with this article.

The department of education shall administer and enforce this article.

The department shall establish minimum standards for all schools described in subsection (a) of this section and provide for the investigation and evaluation of the schools as necessary to administer this article.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 228, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-37.1; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 191; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-191; W.S. 1977, §

21-11-101

; Laws 1985, ch. 142, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 1994, ch. 65, § 1; 1996, ch. 84, § 1; 2000, ch. 72, § 1; 2003, ch. 40, § 1; 2006, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), added the exception language, deleted “and all degree granting post secondary education institutions not accredited by an accrediting association recognized by the United States department of education” following “private schools”; rewrote (b), inserted “private,” summarized the notification to the department of education and registration of prior to doing business; deleted “state board of education, through the state” preceding “department” in (c), and in (d), substituted “department” for “board” in the first sentence and deleted the remaining sentences concerning inspection and visitation of businesses or places where services are delivered.

Constitutionality. —

No classification had been created by the Private School Licensing Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

21-2-401

through -407, and it was unnecessary to do any further analysis under the test where those institutions that were already accredited obviously did not have to apply to become accredited, and those institutions that were not accredited had to become accredited within the time frame provided; therefore, no equal protection violation occurred because different classifications were not created under the act or the rules adopted by the Wyoming Department of Education.
Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of private vocational or trade school for fraud or misrepresentations inducing student to enroll or pay fees, 85 ALR4th 1079.

Validity of state or local government regulation requiring private school to report attendance and similar information to government — post-Yoder cases, 8 ALR5th 875.

§ 21-2-402.
Licensure; registration of private degree granting post secondary education institutions; fees; suspension and revocation; notification upon entry into state.

Schools specified under W.S. 21-2-401(a) excluding those schools exempt under W.S.

21-2-406

and private degree granting post secondary education institutions subject to subsections (b) and (f) of this section, shall pay an annual license fee established by rule and regulation of the department in an amount that, to the extent practicable, generates a total revenue from the fees collected that approximates but does not exceed the direct and indirect costs of administering the regulatory provisions required under this article.

Except as provided by subsection (f) of this section, private degree granting post secondary education institutions shall annually apply to the department of education for registration under this article. Application shall be in a manner and on a form prescribed by the department and shall include documentation or other verification of accreditation by an accrediting association recognized by the United States department of education or verification of candidacy or verification of otherwise being in the application process status for accreditation. Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, an annual registration fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be collected by the department prior to issuing a registration certificate under this article. If the applicant is a candidate for accreditation or is otherwise in the application process for accreditation, and the applicant submits verification of candidacy or application status together with a performance bond or other form of security required under W.S.

21-2-405

, the department shall collect an annual registration fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each year the applicant institution remains a candidate or continues the application process, up to a period of not to exceed five (5) years, until the institution receives accreditation or upon refusal of accreditation by the accrediting association, whichever first occurs. The period of candidacy or otherwise in the application process status expires at the end of the five (5) year period or at the time the applicant is refused candidacy or application status or accreditation by the accrediting association, or otherwise loses candidacy or application status, whichever occurs first, and the applicant shall not operate or conduct business in this state unless, upon a showing of good cause by the applicant, the department finds the five (5) year period of candidacy or applicant status should be extended. As used in this article, “candidate for accreditation or otherwise in the application process” means that within three (3) months of first enrolling students, or by July 1, 2006, for any private degree granting post secondary education institution licensed to operate or do business under this article prior to July 1, 2006, the private degree granting post secondary education institution has applied for accreditation by an accrediting association recognized by the United States department of education and is being considered for candidacy status or for accreditation by that association and is in the process of gathering information and performing activities requested by that association to complete the application process.

(i) through (xii) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 34, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 34, § 2.

Subject to the requirements of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, the department may suspend or revoke a registration certificate issued under this section to any private degree granting post secondary education institution for loss of accreditation status or loss of accreditation candidacy or application status during any registration period.

All fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the general fund.

Any private degree granting post secondary education institution entering this state after July 1, 2006, with the intent of operating and doing business in this state, shall notify the department of education in a manner and within the time prescribed by rule and regulation of the department. Notification shall include submission of a performance bond or other form of security in an amount and in the manner prescribed by W.S.

21-2-405

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 228, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-37.2; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 192; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-192; W.S. 1977, § 21-11-102; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 1994, ch. 65, § 1; 1996, ch. 84, § 1; 2000, ch. 72, § 1; 2003, ch. 40, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2006, ch. 34, §§ 1, 2.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(x)(B), substituted “or one hundred” for “and one hundred.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), inserted “private degree granting,” “and [subsection] (f)”, in the first clause, “generates a,” preceding “total revenue”; rewrote (b), repealed (b)(i) through (b)(xii) which pertained to what should be included in the application form; and repealed (c), which pertained to licenses issued under former subsection (b) and the period of time in which it is valid.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Constitutionality. —

Although requirement of accreditation was a delegation of power made by the Wyoming department of education to the accrediting institution, this delegation did not violate the Wyoming Constitution as the Wyoming Constitution does not directly prohibit delegations of public power to private entities or to public agencies, and any constitutional limitation was therefore indirect; here, applicants had sufficient guarantees of due process, and the delegation of accreditation to private entities was reasonable.
Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of private vocational or trade school for fraud or misrepresentations inducing student to enroll or pay fees, 85 ALR4th 1079.

§ 21-2-403.
Licensing and regulation of qualifications of agents of private schools and institutions; fee.

Agents of those schools or institutions specified under W.S. 21-2-401(a) or (b) who operate in the state and agents employed to solicit resident students by schools or institutions located outside the state which are similar to schools or institutions specified under W.S. 21-2-401(a) or (b), shall be licensed under this article before soliciting students and representing schools or institutions in this state.

The department of education shall regulate qualifications of agents licensed under this section and shall establish a license fee in an amount that, to the extent practicable, the total revenue generated from the fees collected approximates, but does not exceed, the direct and indirect costs of administering the regulatory provisions required for the administration of this article. Fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 193; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-193; W.S. 1977, § 21-11-103; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 1994, ch. 65, § 1; 1996, ch. 84, § 1; 2006, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “or institutions” and inserted “or (b)” throughout (a); and deleted “state board, through the state” preceding “department” in (b), and made a stylistic change.

§ 21-2-404.
Operation without license or registration unlawful; soliciting business in public schools; furnishing list of students.

No person shall operate a school or institution as defined in W.S.

21-2-401

in Wyoming and no private school or institution shall conduct business in Wyoming without first obtaining a license, registration or providing notification under this article.

Unless the school or institution, proprietor or its agent has been licensed, registered or has provided notification as required under this article, no official or employee of the Wyoming state department of education, any college or university within the state or any school district within the state, shall:

Permit the school or institution, or proprietor or agent thereof, to solicit business in any public school within this state; and

Provide any list of students or other list of prospects to the school, institution or proprietor or agent thereof.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 34, § 2.

No school or institution licensed, registered or providing notification under this article shall claim or advertise to prospective or enrolled students that it is accredited in the United States unless the named accrediting association, commission or other entity is approved by the United States department of education, and if an institution described under W.S. 21-2-401(b), is accepted by the department.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 228, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-37.3; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 194; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-194; W.S. 1977, § 21-11-104; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 1996, ch. 84, § 1; 2000, ch. 72, § 1; 2006, ch. 34, §§ 1, 2.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “or institution” and inserted “registration or providing notification” throughout (a), (b), and (d); repealed (c), which pertained to the awarding of a degree by a post secondary education institution; substituted “and if an institution described under W.S. 21-2-401(b), is accepted by the department” for “or the council for higher education accreditation” in (d); and made similar changes.

§ 21-2-405.
Performance bond or other security; amount; exemption.

Before any school is issued a license under this article and before any private degree granting post secondary education institution operates in this state under a registration issued under accreditation candidacy or application status or under notification pursuant to W.S. 21-2-402(f), it shall submit to the department of education a performance bond or other form of security prescribed by rule and regulation of the department. The bond or other form of security shall be in an amount specified by department rule and regulation subject to limitations prescribed by this subsection. The bond for private schools and for private degree granting post secondary education institutions applying for registration under accreditation candidacy or application status pursuant to W.S. 21-2-402(b) or notifying the department under W.S. 21-2-402(f), except those schools excluded under subsection (b) of this section and accredited private degree granting post secondary education institutions registered under this article, shall be not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00). The bonds or other form of security shall be approved by the attorney general and shall be renewed annually as long as the school retains its license to do business in Wyoming or until the institution receives accreditation. The performance bond or other form of security is to assure protection of all persons enrolled in a course of study who may be aggrieved by any school doing business or operating in the state. The department of education is custodian of all bonds and other securities filed under this section and may render administrative but not legal assistance to all aggrieved persons who may be entitled to relief under the bond.

This section shall not apply to private elementary or secondary schools described under W.S. 21-2-401(a) and otherwise subject to this article.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 195; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-195; W.S. 1977, § 21-11-105; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 1994, ch. 65, § 1; 1996, ch. 84, § 1; 2003, ch. 40, § 1; 2004, ch. 28, § 1; 2006, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), in the second sentence, substituted “regulation subject to limitations prescribed by this subsection” for “regulation, except,” and, in the third sentence, inserted “degree granting” preceding “post secondary,” and added the language beginning “and for all other private schools” to the end of the sentence.

Laws 2004, ch. 28, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), inserted “and before any private degree granting post secondary education institution operates in this state under a registration issued under accreditation candidacy or application status or under notification pursuant to W.S. 21-2-402(f),” deleted “state” preceding “department,”substituted “private schools and for private degree granting post secondary education institutions applying for registration under accreditation candidacy or application status pursuant to W.S. 21-2-402(b) or notifying the department under W.S. 21-2-402(f)” for “a degree granting post secondary education institution shall be not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) and for all other private schools,” inserted “and accredited private degree granting post secondary education institutions registered under this article,” and inserted “or until the institution receives accreditation.”

§ 21-2-406.
Schools exempted; definition.

This article does not apply to:

Any parochial, church or religious school as defined by W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iv) which is maintained by a church, religious denomination or religious organization comprised of multidenominational members of the same recognized religion, lawfully operating the school or institution pursuant to applicable laws governing its organization, and the school or institution:

Offers elementary and secondary education programs only; or

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 34 § 2.

Operates as a degree granting post secondary education institution, provides instruction through means not defined as distance education and the institution:

Issues diplomas or degrees restricted to the beliefs and practices of the affiliated church, religious denomination or religious organization and includes a statement on the face of issued diplomas or degrees and course transcripts referencing the theological or religious nature of the subject area for which any diploma or degree is awarded, clearly reflecting the nature of the diploma title as “Diploma of Religious Studies” or degree title as “Associate of Religious Studies”, “Associate of Arts of Religious Studies”, “Bachelor of Religious Studies” or “Bachelor of Arts of Religious Studies”;

Annually files with the department evidence of nonprofit religious organization status for purposes of federal taxation and organization under the laws of this state; and

On and after the effective date of this act for any institution not currently operating in this state, not less than sixty (60) days prior to first issuing any degree under this subparagraph, reports to the department any degree which the institution will award and the religious affiliation the institution maintains.

A home-based educational program as defined by W.S. 21-4-101(a)(v);

Aircraft flight training schools approved and authorized by the federal aviation agency of the United States of America;

A nondegree granting school teaching techniques of outdoor recreation, leadership, ecology or conservation domiciled in the state of Wyoming; or

A post secondary education institution admitted, authorized and in good standing under the state authorization reciprocity agreement pursuant to W.S.

21-18-226

.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 34, § 2.

For the purposes of this section, “distance education” means the teacher and student are physically separated by time or space and connected by means of a communications source used to provide synchronous or asynchronous instruction.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 228, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 21-37.4; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 196; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-196; Laws 1971, ch. 65, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 21-11-106; Laws 1985, ch. 142, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 2004, ch. 112, § 1; 2006, ch. 34, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2010, ch. 15, § 1; 2015 ch. 3, § 2, effective February 17, 2015.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote the section, clarifying exemptions from licensing requirements for religious schools as specified, and imposing additional requirements upon certain post secondary religious schools for receiving and maintaining exemption status.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, repealed (a)(i)(B), which pertained to the operation and limitations in regard to parochial, church or religious schools; repealed (b), which pertained to accreditation.

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

added (a)(i)(C) and (c), and made a related change.

Laws 2010, ch. 15 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2010.

The 2015 amendment,

added (a)(v) and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 3, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 17, 2015.

§ 21-2-407.
Penalties; injunction.

Any person violating the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or both. Each solicitation of enrollment or each transaction of business without a license, registration certificate or without providing notification to the department constitutes a separate offense. Any person violating the provisions of this article may also be enjoined from the continuation of the violation by proceedings brought by the attorney general, any district attorney, any school official or any aggrieved citizen, regardless of whether criminal proceedings have been instituted.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 228, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 21-37.5; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 197; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-197; W.S. 1977, § 21-11-107; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 2003, ch. 40, § 1; 2006, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “registration certificate or without providing notification to the department” in (a); and made a related change.